Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-7110
Critical incident stress management region; regional management committee; membership; regional clinical director; duties.

Each critical incident stress management region shall have a regional management committee composed of representatives of the Department of Health and Human Services, the State Fire Marshal, and the Nebraska State Patrol and a regional clinical director. The regional clinical director shall have a graduate degree in a mental health discipline. The regional management committee shall be responsible for the implementation and coordination of the program in the region according to the specifications developed by the department. The regional management committee shall develop critical incident stress management teams to facilitate the stress management process.

Laws 1991, LB 703, § 10;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 776;

Laws 1997, LB 184, § 10;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 671;

Laws 2025, LB346, § 46;

Laws 2026, LB905, § 33.
July 1, 2026